New York, session 2025-2026, A1765.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 13.19 of the parks, recreation and 2 historic preservation law, as amended by chapter 103 of the laws of 3 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 2. For the purposes of this section (a) "veteran" shall mean a resi- 5 dent of this state who is: (i) a veteran as such term is defined in 6 section one of the veterans' services law; or (ii) a person who has 7 served on active duty for the state as a member of the state organized 8 militia as defined in subdivision nine of section one of the military 9 law and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other 10 than dishonorable; or (iii) a person who has served on active duty in 11 the uniformed services of the United States or on active duty for the 12 state as a member of the organized militia and has a qualifying condi- 13 tion, as defined in section one of the veterans' services law, and has 14 received a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable from such 15 service, or is a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section one of 16 the veterans' services law, and has received a discharge other than bad 17 conduct or dishonorable from such service; [and] 18 (b) "member of a Gold Star family" shall mean a resident of this state 19 who is a gold star parent as defined in section twenty-six of the veter- 20 ans' services law, the spouse or domestic partner, or the biological, 21 step, or legally adopted minor child of a veteran whose death qualified 22 the parent for an annuity[.]; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04713-01-5 A. 1765 2 1 (c) "non-ambulatory" shall mean a person who is permanently disa- 2 bled and requires the use of a wheelchair to access park facilities or 3 is unable to move about in a field, wood, or other natural area without 4 mechanical assistance. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.